California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department shall administer a voluntary Temporary Assistance Program (TAP) for current and future CalWORKs recipients who meet the exemption criteria for work participation activities set forth in Section 11320.3 and are not single parents who have a child under the age of one year. Temporary Assistance Program recipients shall be entitled to the same assistance payments and other benefits as recipients under the CalWORKs program. The purpose of this program is to provide cash assistance and other benefits to eligible families without any federal restrictions or requirements and without any adverse impact on recipients. The Temporary Assistance Program shall commence no later than October 1, 2016.

(b) CalWORKs
 recipients who meet the exemption criteria for work participation activities set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, and are not single parents with a child under one year of age, shall have the option of receiving grant payments, child care, and transportation services from the Temporary Assistance Program. The department shall notify all CalWORKs recipients and applicants meeting the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3, except for single parents with a child under the age of one year, of their option to receive benefits under the Temporary Assistance Program. Absent written indication that these recipients or applicants choose not to receive assistance from the Temporary Assistance Program, the department shall enroll CalWORKs recipients and applicants into the program. However, exempt volunteers shall remain in the CalWORKs program unless they affirmatively indicate, in writing, their interest in enrolling in the Temporary Assistance Program. A Temporary Assistance
 Program recipient who no longer meets the exemption criteria set forth in Section 11320.3 shall be enrolled in the CalWORKs program.

(c) Funding for grant payments, child care, transportation, and eligibility determination activities for families receiving benefits under the Temporary Assistance Program shall be funded with General Fund resources that do not count toward the state’s maintenance of effort requirements under clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 609 of Title 42 of the United States Code, up to the caseload level equivalent to the amount of funding provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that recipients shall have and maintain access to the hardship exemption and the services necessary to begin and increase participation in welfare-to-work activities, regardless of their
 county of origin, and that the number of recipients exempt under subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3 not significantly increase due to factors other than changes in caseload characteristics. All relevant state law applicable to CalWORKs recipients shall also apply to families funded under this section. This section does not modify the criteria for exemption in Section 11320.3.

(e) To the extent that this section is inconsistent with federal regulations regarding implementation of the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, the department may amend the funding structure for exempt families to ensure consistency with these regulations, not later than 30 days after providing written notification to the chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairs of the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on June 30,
 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 6.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.   Inoperative June 30, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11321.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, sanctions shall not be applied for a grieving parent’s failure or refusal to comply with program requirements during the month in which a child in the assistance unit died, or the following month.

(b) Upon receiving notification of the death of a child in an assistance unit, the county shall do both of the following:

(1) Assist a grieving parent in accessing services for which the parent may be eligible. These services may include, but are not limited to, nutrition supplement programs, housing assistance, and other cash aid programs.

(2) Provide information to the grieving parent
 about mental health services, including, but not limited to, information about, and a referral to, services provided by the county human services agency, if appropriate.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “grieving parent” means an aided adult who is required to participate in welfare-to-work activities and who experiences the death of a child in his or her assistance unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   (AB 433)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11321.6.

(a) A county plan may provide that the program provided for in this article shall apply to recipients of aid under Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000), except that no funds appropriated for purposes of this article shall be utilized for purposes of applying this article to these individuals.

(b) A county plan may also provide that the program provided for in this article shall apply to refugees receiving Refugee Cash Assistance.

(c) The county shall maintain separate accounting
 records of expenditures related to applicants for, and recipients of, aid under this chapter, and for the individuals to whom the program applies pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). If a county elects to apply the program provided for in this article to refugees receiving Refugee Cash Assistance or to refugee recipients of aid under Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000), costs of applying the program shall be funded from the county’s federal social services and targeted assistance allocation as provided for under Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13275).

(d) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), a county elects to apply the program provided for in this article to refugees or to recipients of aid under Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000), these individuals shall have the same rights, duties, and responsibilities that a participant has who is an applicant for, or a recipient of, aid under this chapter. Any participation by general assistance
 recipients shall not constitute any actual or implied responsibility for, or assumption of, costs of general assistance by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1568, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1990.   Operative October 1, 1990, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1568.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.2.

Counties shall continually monitor their program expenditures throughout the fiscal year. If a county determines that its anticipated expenditures will exceed the amount of that year’s allocations as a result of an unexpected event, including caseload increases, court cases, or significant justifiable increases in component costs, the county shall immediately notify the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 75.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature to fund welfare-to-work activities under this article so that all recipients of aid under this chapter for whom participation under this article is required can be served and, in addition, so that recipients voluntarily participating under this article can be served.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 77.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to do each of the following:

(1) Maximize the ability of CalWORKs recipients to benefit from the federal or state Earned Income Tax Credit (EITC), including retroactive EITC credits and the Advance EITC, take advantage of the earned-income disregard to increase their CalFresh benefits, and accumulate credit toward future social security income.

(2) Educate and empower all CalWORKs participants who receive the federal or state EITC to save or invest part or all of their credits in instruments such as individual development accounts, 401(k) plans, 403(b) plans, IRAs, 457 plans, Coverdell ESA plans, an account established pursuant to the California Secure Choice Retirement Savings Program (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000), of the Government Code), restricted accounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2, or 529 plans, and to take advantage of the federal Assets for Independence program and other matching funds, tools, and training available from public or private sources, in order to build their assets.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that counties encourage CalWORKs recipients to participate in activities that will maximize their receipt of the EITC. To this end, counties may do all of the following:

(1) Structure welfare-to-work activities pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of Section 11322.6 to give recipients the option of maximizing the portion of their CalWORKs benefits that meets the definition of “earned income” in Section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Inform CalWORKs recipients of each of the following:

(A) That earned income, either previous or future, may make them eligible for the federal or state EITC,
 including retroactive EITC credits and the Advance EITC, increase their
 CalFresh benefits, and accumulate credit toward future social security income.

(B) That recipients, as part of their welfare-to-work plans, have the option of engaging in subsidized employment and grant-based on-the-job training, as specified in Section 11322.6, and that participating in these activities will increase their earned income to the extent that they meet the requirements of federal law.

(C) That receipt of the federal or state EITC does not affect their CalWORKs grant and is additional tax-free income for them.

(D) That a CalWORKs recipient who receives the federal or state
 EITC may invest these funds in an individual development account, 401(k) plan, 403(b) plan, IRA, 457 plan, 529 college savings plan, Coverdell ESA, an account established pursuant to the California Secure Choice Retirement Savings Program, or restricted account, and that investments in these accounts will not make the recipient ineligible for CalWORKs benefits or reduce the recipient’s CalWORKs benefits.

(3) At each regular eligibility redetermination, the county shall ask a recipient whether the recipient is eligible for and takes advantage of the EITC. If the recipient may be eligible and does not participate, the county shall give the recipient the federal or state EITC form and encourage and assist the recipient to
 take advantage of it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.6.

The welfare-to-work plan developed by the county welfare department and the participant pursuant to this article shall provide for welfare-to-work activities. Welfare-to-work activities may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) Unsubsidized employment.

(b) Subsidized private sector employment.

(c) Subsidized public sector employment.

(d) Work experience, which means public or private sector work that shall help provide basic job skills, enhance existing job skills in a position related to the participant’s experience, or provide a needed community service that will lead
 to employment. Unpaid work experience shall be limited to 12 months, unless the county welfare department and the recipient agree to extend this period by an amendment to the welfare-to-work plan. The county welfare department shall review the work experience assignment as appropriate and make revisions as necessary to ensure that it continues to be consistent with the participant’s plan and effective in preparing the participant to attain employment.

(e) On-the-job training.

(f) (1) Grant-based on-the-job training, which means public or private sector employment or on-the-job training in which the recipient’s cash grant, or a portion thereof, or the aid grant savings resulting from employment, or both, is diverted to the employer as a wage subsidy to partially or wholly offset the payment of wages to the participant, so long as the total amount diverted does
 not exceed the family’s maximum aid payment.

(2) A county shall not assign a participant to grant-based on-the-job training unless and until the participant has voluntarily agreed to participate in grant-based on-the-job training by executing a voluntary agreement form, which shall be developed by the department. The agreement shall include, but not be limited to, information on the following:

(A) How job termination or another event will not result in loss of the recipient’s grant funds, pursuant to department regulations.

(B) (i) How to obtain the federal Earned Income Tax Credit (EITC), including the Advance EITC, and increased CalFresh benefits, which may become available due to increased earned income.

(ii) This subparagraph
 shall only become operative when and to the extent that the department determines that it reflects current federal law and Internal Revenue Service regulations.

(C) How these financial supports should increase the participant’s current income and how increasing earned income should increase the recipient’s future social security income.

(3) Grant-based on-the-job training shall include community service positions pursuant to Section 11322.9.

(4) Any portion of a wage from employment that is funded by the diversion of a recipient’s cash grant, or the grant savings from employment pursuant to this subdivision, or both, shall not be exempt under Section 11451.5 from the calculation of the income of the family for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11450.

(g) Supported work or transitional employment, which means forms of grant-based on-the-job training in which the recipient’s cash grant, or a portion thereof, or the aid grant savings from employment, is diverted to an intermediary service provider, to partially or wholly offset the payment of wages to the participant.

(h) Work study.

(i) Self-employment.

(j) Community service.

(k) Adult basic education, which shall include reading, writing, arithmetic, high school proficiency, or general educational development certificate of instruction,
 and English as a second language. Participants under this subdivision shall be referred to appropriate service providers that include, but are not limited to, educational programs operated by school districts or county offices of education that have contracted with the Superintendent of Public Instruction to provide services to participants pursuant to Section 33117.5 of the Education Code.

(l) Job skills training directly related to employment.

(m) Vocational education and training, including, but not limited to, college and community college education, adult education, regional occupational centers, and regional occupational programs.

(n) Job search and job readiness assistance, which means providing the recipient with training to learn job seeking and interviewing skills, to understand employer
 expectations, and learn skills designed to enhance an individual’s capacity to move toward self-sufficiency, including financial management education.

(o) Education directly related to employment.

(p) Satisfactory progress in secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general educational development, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or received such a certificate.

(q) Mental health, substance abuse, and domestic violence services, described in Sections 11325.7 and 11325.8, and Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 11495), that are necessary to obtain and retain employment.

(r) Other activities necessary to assist an individual in obtaining unsubsidized employment.

Assignment to an educational activity identified in subdivisions (k), (m), (o), and (p) is limited to those situations in which the education is needed to become employed.

(s) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by the act that added this subdivision, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 10.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.     Conditionally repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.6.

(a) The welfare-to-work plan developed pursuant to this article shall provide for welfare-to-work activities. Welfare-to-work activities may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Educational activities, which may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Postsecondary education leading to a degree or certificate, which may be attended in person or online.

(B) Obtaining a high school diploma.

(C) Technical training and vocational education and training, including, but not limited to, college and community college
 education, adult education, regional occupational centers, and regional occupational programs.

(D) Career-specific education.

(E) Job skills training.

(F) Adult basic education, which shall include reading, writing, arithmetic, high school proficiency, or a general educational development certificate of instruction, and English as a second language. Participants under this subparagraph shall be referred to appropriate service providers that include, but are not limited to, educational programs operated by school districts or county offices of education that have contracted with the Superintendent of Public Instruction to provide services to participants pursuant to Section 33117.5 of the Education Code.

(2) Work activities, which may include, but are
 not limited to, those set forth in Section 261.30 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any of the following:

(A) Unsubsidized employment.

(B) Subsidized private or public sector employment.

(C) Work experience, which means public or private sector work that shall help provide basic job skills, enhance existing job skills in a position related to the participant’s experience, or provide a needed community service that will lead to employment. Unpaid work experience shall be limited to 12 months, unless the county welfare department and the recipient agree to extend this period by an amendment to the welfare-to-work plan. The county welfare department shall review the work experience assignment as appropriate and make revisions as necessary to ensure that it continues to be consistent with the
 participant’s plan and effective in preparing the participant to attain employment.

(D) On-the-job training.

(E) (i) Grant-based on-the-job training, which means public or private sector employment or on-the-job training in which the recipient’s cash grant, or a portion thereof, or the aid grant savings resulting from employment, or both, is diverted to the employer as a wage subsidy to partially or wholly offset the payment of wages to the participant, so long as the total amount diverted does not exceed the family’s maximum aid payment.

(ii) A county shall not assign a participant to grant-based on-the-job training unless and until the participant has voluntarily agreed to participate in grant-based on-the-job training by executing a voluntary agreement form, which shall be developed by the
 department. The agreement shall include, but not be limited to, information on the following:

(I) How job termination or another event will not result in loss of the recipient’s grant funds, pursuant to department regulations.

(II) (ia) How to obtain the federal Earned Income Tax Credit (EITC), including the Advance EITC, and increased CalFresh benefits, which may become available due to increased earned income.

(ib) This subparagraph shall only become operative when and to the extent that the department determines that it reflects current federal law and Internal Revenue Service regulations.

(III) How these financial supports should increase the participant’s current income and how increasing earned income should increase the
 recipient’s future social security income.

(iii) Grant-based on-the-job training shall include community service positions pursuant to Section 11322.9.

(iv) Any portion of a wage from employment that is funded by the diversion of a recipient’s cash grant, or the grant savings from employment pursuant to this subdivision, or both, shall not be exempt under Section 11451.5 from the calculation of the income of the family for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11450.

(F) Supported work or transitional employment, which means forms of grant-based on-the-job training in which the recipient’s cash grant, or a portion thereof, or the aid grant savings from employment, is diverted to an intermediary service provider, to partially or wholly offset the payment of wages to the participant.

(3) Barrier removal services, when available, which may include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Mental health services, as described in Section 11325.7; substance abuse treatment services, as described in Section 11325.8; CalWORKs Home Visiting Program services, as described in Article 3.4 (commencing with Section 11330.6); and domestic violence services, as described in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 11495).

(B) Financial literacy classes and coaching.

(C) Activities that develop and enhance workplace skills, including, but not limited to, career-specific training programs, English language learning, literacy and mathematics skill courses, or credential programs.

(D) Working with children’s health and school professionals, parenting classes, education-related appointments for the participant or their dependents, child welfare or child welfare-related activities, and any other activities to help ensure child well-being and family unity.

(E) Activities that build foundations for employment, including, but not limited to, housing search efforts.

(F) Activities related to legal issues or housing stability, including, but not limited to, court appearances, housing searches and tenant rights and obligation classes, homeless support programs, and shelter participation requirements.

(b) The department shall have the discretion to identify additional plan activities that improve employment opportunities and family well-being.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.61.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 11327.5, if there is any interruption in receipt of income for an employee in a grant-based on-the-job training program, as provided for pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 11322.6, that is caused by an employer’s conduct, the county shall ensure that a recipient receives 100 percent of the maximum aid payment, not counting the unpaid wages, that the assistance unit is eligible to receive. The payment shall be made as a supplemental grant payment. The county shall act to
 recover from the employer any amount of the grant diverted to the employer that was not paid as wages to the recipient. The agreement between the county and the employer pertaining to grant-based on-the-job training shall state that the county will take action to collect from the employer the amount of the grant diverted to the employer that was not paid as wages to the recipient.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 11322.6, counties using grant-based on-the-job training shall monitor employers participating in grant-based on-the-job training, and shall cancel the participation of employers who demonstrate, over time, any of the following:

(1) An unwillingness to hire recipients who have participated in grant-based on-the-job training with that employer.

(2) An inability to provide job skills that enable
 participants to obtain nonsubsidized employment with other employers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 933, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.62.

Employers, sponsors of training activities, and contractors shall not discriminate against participants on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.64.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop an allocation methodology to distribute additional funding for expanded subsidized employment programs for CalWORKs recipients, or individuals described in Section 11320.15 who have exceeded the time limits specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11454.

(2) Funds allocated pursuant to this section may be utilized to cover all expenditures related to the operational costs of the expanded subsidized employment program, including the cost of overseeing the program, developing work sites, and providing training to participants, as well as wage and nonwage costs.

(3) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall determine the amount or proportion of funding allocated pursuant to this section that may be utilized for operational costs, consistent with the number of employment slots anticipated to be created and the funding provided.

(b) Funds allocated for expanded subsidized employment shall be in addition to, and independent of, the county allocations made pursuant to Section 15204.2.

(c) (1) A county that accepts additional funding for expanded subsidized employment in accordance with this section shall continue to expend no less than the aggregate amount of funding received by the county pursuant to Section 15204.2 that the county expended on subsidized employment in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to Section 11322.63, as that section read on June
 30, 2016.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply for any fiscal year in which the total CalWORKs caseload is projected by the department to increase by more than 5 percent of the total actual CalWORKs caseload in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(d) (1) Each participating county shall submit to the department, at least once every two years, a plan or an amendment to an existing plan that specifies how the county intends to carry out all of the following:

(A) Utilize the funds allocated pursuant to this section.

(B) Prioritize subsidized employment placements that offer opportunities for participants to obtain skills and experiences in their fields of interest.

(2) If a county has no changes to an existing plan or amendment to
 report to the department pursuant to paragraph (1), the county shall submit a confirmation of no change to the department.

(3) Participating counties shall submit the plans described in paragraph (1) beginning January 1, 2025, or four months after the department issues guidance on how to implement this subdivision, whichever is later.

(e) (1) Participation in subsidized employment pursuant to this section shall be limited to a maximum of six months for each participant.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a county may extend participation beyond the six-month limitation described in paragraph (1) for up to an additional three months at a time, to a maximum of no
 more than 12 total months. Extensions may be granted pursuant to this paragraph if the county determines that the additional time will increase the likelihood of either of the following:

(A) The participant obtaining unsubsidized employment with the participating employer.

(B) The participant obtaining specific skills and experiences relevant for unsubsidized employment in a particular field.

(f) A county may continue to provide subsidized employment funded under this section to individuals who become ineligible for CalWORKs benefits in accordance with Section 11323.25.

(g) A county may use existing funds provided under this section to provide employment services for noncustodial parents of children receiving benefits under the CalWORKs program.

(h) Upon application for CalWORKs assistance after a participant’s subsidized employment ends, if an assistance unit is otherwise eligible within three calendar months of the date that subsidized employment ended, the income exemption requirements contained in Section 11451.5 and the work requirements contained in subdivision (c) of Section 11201 shall apply. If aid is restored after the expiration of that three-month period, the income exemption requirements contained in Section 11450.12 and the work requirements contained in subdivision (b) of Section 11201 shall apply.

(i) Beginning April 1, 2025, the department shall include all of the following information for the prior fiscal year regarding the implementation of this section in the CalWORKs Annual Summary to the extent the data is available and
 reportable:

(1) The number of CalWORKs participants who participated in subsidized employment for at least three months, by county, and a complete list of participating employers, by county.

(2) The number of CalWORKs participants described in paragraph (1) who obtained unsubsidized employment in the quarter following the end of the subsidy, by county, based on wage data and supplemental records available to the Employment Development Department.

(3) The average earnings of the CalWORKs participants
 described in paragraph (1) in the quarter prior to their participation in the program, to the extent the data is available. The data required by this paragraph shall be broken down by county and by industry sector. The industry sector data shall also be further broken down by county.

(4) The average earnings of the CalWORKs participants described in paragraph (1) in the quarter following the end of the subsidy, to the extent the data is available. The data required by this paragraph shall be broken down by county and by industry sector. The industry sector data shall also be further broken down by county.

(j) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the changes made by the act that added this subdivision through all-county letters without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 13.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.65.

(a) Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, assignment to any activity otherwise authorized under this article shall be limited in any county to the number or percentage of participants specified under Section 407 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 607) and subsequent amendments thereto, unless the recipient is concurrently participating in any activities that will count for the required number of hours of participation under federal law.

(b) Subdivision
 (a) shall not apply if the statewide percentage, as determined by the department, is less than the limits described in federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.67.

(a) If a pregnant woman is required to participate in work under this article, she may satisfy the work participation requirements by participating in a voluntary maternal, infant, and early childhood home visiting program or another voluntary home visiting program for low-income Californians that is approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The hours that the woman participates in the home visiting program shall be applied to the work participation hours required by Section 11322.8 for a period of no longer than 10 months.

(b) In accordance with Section 11329.2, this section shall be implemented only upon receipt of a waiver of
 compliance with Section 602 of Title 42 of the United States Code by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, for purposes of establishing more effective ways to meet the goals of CalWORKs, particularly helping parents successfully prepare for employment and supporting the health and well-being of children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 563, Sec. 4.   (SB 252)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.7.

(a) Every county shall provide an adequate range of those activities described in Section 11322.6 to ensure each participant’s access to needed activities and services to assist him or her in seeking employment, to provide education and training the participant needs to find self-supporting work, and to arrange for placement in paid or unpaid work settings that will enhance a participant’s ability to obtain unsubsidized employment.

(b) No plan shall require job search and work
 experience of participants to the exclusion of a range of activities to be offered to recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 84.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.8.

(a) An adult recipient required to participate in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85, unless otherwise exempt, shall participate in welfare-to-work activities for the following number of hours per week during the month:

(1) An average of at least 30 hours per week, if the assistance unit includes either of the following, but does not include a child under six years of age:

(A) One adult.

(B) Two adults, one of whom is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(2) An average of at least 20 hours per week, if the assistance unit includes a child under six years of age and either of the following:

(A) One adult.

(B) Two adults, one of whom is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(3) An average of at least 20 hours per week, if the assistance unit consists only of a pregnant person.

(4) An average of at least 35 hours per week, if the adult recipient is an unemployed parent, as defined in Section 11201, except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2). However, both parents in a two-parent assistance unit may contribute to the 35 hours.

(b) An adult recipient required to participate in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85, unless otherwise exempt, shall participate in welfare-to-work activities for the following number of hours per week during the month:

(1) An average of at least 30 hours per week, subject to the special rules and limitations described in Section 607(c)(1)(A) of Title 42 of
 the United States Code as of January 1, 2013, if the assistance unit consists of only a pregnant person, or includes one of the following but does not include a child under six years of age:

(A) One adult.

(B) Two adults, one of whom is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(2) An average of at least 20 hours per week, as described in Section 607(c)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code as of January 1, 2013, if the assistance unit includes only one adult and a child under six years of age.

(3) An average of at least 35 hours per week, if the adult recipient is an unemployed parent, as defined in Section 11201, except as provided in paragraph (1) and subject to the special rules and limitations described in Section 607(c)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code as of January 1, 2013.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11322.8, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 46.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.8.

(a) An adult recipient required to participate in welfare-to-work activities, unless otherwise exempt, shall participate in welfare-to-work activities for the following number of hours per week during the month:

(1) An average of at least 30 hours per week, if the assistance unit includes either of the following, but does not include a child under six years of age:

(A) One adult.

(B) Two adults, one of whom is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(2) An average of at least 20 hours per week, if
 the assistance unit includes a child under six years of age and either of the following:

(A) One adult.

(B) Two adults, one of whom is disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(3) An average of at least 20 hours per week, if the assistance unit consists only of a pregnant person.

(4) An average of at least 35 hours per week, if the adult recipient is an unemployed parent, as defined in Section 11201, except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2). However, both parents in a two-parent assistance unit may contribute to the 35 hours.

(b) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature
 that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 47.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.81.
